Massachusetts, session 194th, H5334.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 - Notwithstanding the six percent limit on the amount of local excise tax that a
municipality other than the City of Boston may impose on the transfer of occupancy of any room
in a bed and breakfast establishment, hotel, lodging house, or motel contained in GL Chapter
64G Section 3A, or the provisions of any other general or special law, the City known as the
Town of Franklin is hereby authorized to impose a local excise tax upon said transactions, up to
eight percent.
Section 2 - This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1